Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB23.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 85 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER GSENIOR PROPERTY TAX FREEZESec.8591. Scope of subchapter.8592. Definitions.8593. Authority.8594. Income eligibility.8595. Tax freeze.8596. Application procedure.8597. Program performance and annual report.8598. Cumulative report.123456789101112131415161718 § 8591. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to senior citizen property tax freeze.§ 8592. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual 65 years of age or older who has established residency in this Commonwealth for five or more years."Base payment." The amount of property tax paid by an applicant in the base year."Base year." The tax year preceding the first tax year for which a taxing authority implements the provisions of this subchapter or the tax year immediately preceding an applicant's approval for a tax freeze under section 8595 (relating to tax freeze)."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Household income." All income as defined in section 1303 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, received by the applicant and by the applicant's spouse during the calendar year for which a tax deferral is claimed.§ 8593. Authority.All political subdivisions shall have the power and authority to grant annual tax freezes in the manner provided in this subchapter.§ 8594. Income eligibility.(a) Tax freeze eligibility.--In the initial year following 20250SB0023PN0008 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the enactment of this subchapter, an applicant shall be eligible for a tax freeze under this subchapter if:(1) the applicant and the applicant's spouse have a household income not exceeding $65,000 annually; or(2) the applicant and the applicant's spouse real property taxes exceed 10% of their household income.(b) Subsequent eligibility.--In each subsequent year, the income eligibility amount under subsection (a)(1) shall be adjusted in accordance with the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U).§ 8595. Tax freeze.(a) Amount frozen.--An applicant shall have real property taxes frozen at the applicant's base year amount for as long as the applicant remains eligible under this subchapter.(b) Tax application.--A tax freeze granted by a political subdivision under this subchapter shall only apply to an applicant's primary residence.(c) Change of residence.--In the event that an applicant changes residences within the political subdivision that implements this program and the political subdivision deems an applicant eligible under section 8594 (relating to income eligibility), the real property tax freeze shall be transferred to the new property and frozen at the rate at which the applicant purchases the residence.(d) Current rate.--The real property tax and the tax rate on the residence shall become current on the sale or transfer of the property for which the tax freeze is in effect.§ 8596. Application procedure.(a) Initial application.--Any person eligible for a tax freeze under this subchapter may apply annually to a political 20250SB0023PN0008 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subdivision. In the initial year of application, the following information shall be provided in the application provided under subsection (b):(1) A certification that the applicant or the applicant's spouse are jointly the owners in fee simple of the homestead upon which the real property taxes are imposed.(2) Receipts showing timely payment of the immediately preceding year's base payment of real property taxes.(3) Proof of income eligibility under section 8594 (relating to income eligibility).(4) Other information required by the political subdivision for the purpose of complying with section 8597(c) (relating to program performance and annual report).(b) Application form.--The department shall develop and, as necessary, update a standardized application form for use by political subdivisions. The application form shall be substantially similar to the application form for property tax or rent rebate claims in accordance with Chapter 13 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act. The department shall transmit the application form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and transmit the application form to political subdivisions upon request. The department may post the application form on a publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Subsequent years.--After the political subdivision authorizes an applicant's initial application, the applicant shall remain eligible for a tax freeze in subsequent years so long as the applicant annually refiles the application with the political subdivision showing that the applicant continues to 20250SB0023PN0008 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meet the eligibility requirements of this subchapter.(d) Death of eligible applicant.--In the event of the death of an eligible applicant, the applicant's spouse, if applicable, shall be eligible for the tax freeze established under this subchapter provided the spouse is 60 years of age or older and meets the income eligibility requirements established in section 8594.§ 8597. Program performance and annual report.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Compile a list of political subdivisions that grant a tax freeze under this subchapter.(2) Compile the aggregate number of individuals granted a tax freeze in each political subdivision that grants a tax freeze under this subchapter.(3) Calculate the difference between the total amount of real property taxes payable by the individuals granted a tax freeze under this subchapter and the total amount of real property taxes that would have been payable by those individuals but for the tax freeze.(4) Prepare and post on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department an annual report with the information under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3).(b) Costs.--The department shall collect the information under subsection (a) in a manner that minimizes the costs and administrative requirements on political subdivisions.(c) Duties of political subdivisions.--(1) A political subdivision that has granted a tax freeze under this subchapter shall notify the department in writing and assist the department in compiling the information under subsection (a).20250SB0023PN0008 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The reporting requirements under this subsection may be submitted electronically to the department.§ 8598. Cumulative report.Not later than December 31, 2029, for the purpose of reviewing the eligibility criteria and effectiveness of the tax freeze under this subchapter , t he department shall submit to the General Assembly a c umulative report with the information contained in the annual reports under section 8597 (a)(4) (relating to program performance and annual report) , along with any other information that the department deems relevant.Section 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0023PN0008 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516